Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4644.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CONVEYANCE OF SURPLUS STATE LAND; WASHINGTON COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, sections 16B.281 to 16B.298, or any other law to the contrary, upon approval by the Minnesota Historical Society's Executive Council, the director of the Minnesota Historical Society may convey to the city of Marine on Saint Croix, for no consideration, the surplus land and real property that is described in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (b) The Minnesota Historical Society may make necessary changes to the legal description to correct errors and ensure accuracy. new text end new text begin (c) The land to be conveyed is located in Washington County and is described as: that part of Block 47 of MARINE, according to the recorded plat thereof, Washington County, Minnesota, described as follows: commencing at the southwest corner of said Block 47, thence North 24 degrees 18 minutes 37 seconds West, assumed bearing, along the westerly line of said Block 47, a distance of 98.35 feet, to the point of beginning of the tract of land to be described; thence continuing North 24 degrees 18 minutes 37 seconds West, along said westerly line of Block 47, a distance of 61.38 feet; thence North 66 degrees 16 minutes 53 seconds East, 89.81 feet; thence South 24 degrees 27 minutes 39 seconds East, 59.63 feet; thence South 65 degrees 09 minutes 47 seconds West, 89.96 feet, to the point of beginning. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end